California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The district shall have power to purchase transit equipment such as cars, trolley buses and motorbuses, or rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect such purchase and leasing of transit equipment, and may dispose of such equipment trust certificates upon such terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate. Payment for such equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates payable from any source or sources of funds
 specified in such certificates that are or will be legally available to the district; and title to such equipment shall not rest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102551.

The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the State of California as trustee, for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates and may direct such trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the district and may authorize the district to simultaneously therewith execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102552.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds, and such agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the district and shall contain such covenants, conditions, and provisions which may be deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from legally available sources or sources of funds specified in such certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102553.

The covenants, conditions, and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes, or certificates of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102554.

An executed copy of each such agreement and lease shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, who will be entitled to receive one dollar ($1) for each such copy filed with him and which filing shall constitute notice to any subsequent judgment creditor or any subsequent purchaser. Each vehicle so purchased or leased shall have the name of the owner or lessor plainly marked on both sides thereof followed by the appropriate words “Owner and Lessor” or “Owner and Vendor,” as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Improvement Acts and Special Benefit Districts [102570. - 102571.]

102570.

The Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102571.

Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99000) of Part 11 applies to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 141.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Temporary Borrowing [102581. - 102584.]

102581.

At any time prior to the first receipt by the district of revenues from taxation or other sources, any city or county may lend any available money to the district for the purposes of organization and operation. Such expenditures shall constitute a proper expenditure of city and county funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102582.

The district may borrow money in accordance with the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), Article 7.4 (commencing with Section 53835), Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 53840), Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850), or Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 53859) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 537, Sec. 3.   (AB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

102583.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized to be issued pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 102500) of this chapter, but which have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the same from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any such notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of such original notes. Such notes may be paid from any moneys of the district available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If not previously otherwise paid, the notes shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the
 bonds of the district in anticipation of which they were issued and if not so paid, taxes may be levied for their payment in the same manner as taxes are levied for the payment of general obligation bonds pursuant to Section 102336 until such bonds are issued. Such notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the district has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of such authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. Such notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the same may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the district authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102584.

In addition to, and as an alternative to, the borrowing authority in Section 102582, the district may seek and obtain a short-term revolving line of credit for operating purposes in anticipation of receipt of federal operating grants, with the extension of credit to the district evidenced by a note, pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of directors of the district. The district may pledge the anticipated grants and any other funds available to the district, including, but not limited to, fare revenues collected by the district in connection with the operation of its transit system and any other revenues, income, or receipts, as security for repayment of the note, the interest on the note, and the related obligations evidenced by the note. The note shall have a maturity date of
 not more than 60 months from the date of issuance. The district may pledge anticipated federal operating grants and other available funds over a multiyear period. Notwithstanding the 60-month maturity period for the line of credit, the maximum indebtedness under the note shall not exceed the maximum amount in federal operating grant revenues that the district anticipates receiving in the next fiscal year. Immediately upon receipt thereof, the district shall set aside and apply all amounts received from the pledged federal operating grant revenues to the repayment of any outstanding indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section, and these federal operating grant revenues may not be used for any other purpose until such time as the indebtedness is fully repaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 328, Sec. 1.   (AB 422)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [102600. - 102603.]

102600.

The district may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860), Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102601.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the district under the provisions of this part, and the interest thereon are free and exempt from all taxation within the State of California, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102602.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions and other proceedings in the issuance by the district of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for improvement districts, revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability shall constitute a contract between the district and the holders of such bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes or evidences of indebtedness or liability, and the provisions thereof shall be enforceable against the district, any or all of its successors or assigns, the state, any department of the state, or any officer
 thereof, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action, or proceeding in law, or in equity, in any court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing contained in this part, or in any other law, shall be held to relieve the district, or the territory included within it, from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the district. Upon dissolution of the district or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, the property formerly included within the district, or withdrawn therefrom, shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of such dissolution or withdrawal the same as if the district had not been so dissolved, or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the state or other successors or assigns to provide for the payment of such bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities. Except as may be otherwise provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of any revenue bonds, bonds secured by a
 pledge of revenues, or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property owned, operated, or controlled by the district shall be pledged, charged, assigned and have a lien thereon for the payment of such bonds as long as the same are outstanding, regardless of any change in ownership, operation, or control of such revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property and it shall, in such later event or events, be the duty of the state or other successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate such revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities or property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102603.

The district shall not incur a total indebtedness under the provisions of this chapter which exceeds 15 percent of the assessed value of all taxable property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Dissolution [102700. - 102700.]

102700.

The district may be dissolved pursuant to the provisions of the District Reorganization Act of 1965 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000), Title 6 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 15. SAN MATEO COUNTY TRANSIT DISTRICT [103000. - 103700.]



  CHAPTER 1. Title of Act and Policy [103000. - 103001.]

103000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “San Mateo County Transit District Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103001.

It is necessary that a transit district be established in the County of San Mateo in order to meet the public transit problems of that county. Because there is no general law under which such a district could be formed, the adoption of a special act and the formation of a special district is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [103010. - 103022.]

103010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103011.

“District” means the San Mateo County Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103012.

“Transit” or “transit service” means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage and parcels by any means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103013.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means any or all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned, or to be acquired, by the district for transit service or purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103014.

“Board of directors”, “board”, or “directors” means the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103015.

“County” means the County of San Mateo.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103015.5.

“Board of supervisors” means the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103016.

“Public agency” includes the State of California, and any county, city, district, or other political subdivision or public entity of, or organized under the laws of, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103017.

“System” means all transit works and transit facilities owned or held, or to be owned or held, by the district for transit purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103018.

“Revenues” means all rates, fares, tolls, rentals, or other income and revenue actually received or receivable by, or for the account of, the district from the operation of the system, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, interest allowed on any moneys or securities any profits derived from the sale of any securities, and any consideration in any way derived from any properties owned, operated, or at any time maintained by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103019.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, trust, business trust, or the receiver or trustee or conservator for any thereof, but does not include a public agency, as defined in Section 103016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 222.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

103020.

“Establish” includes establish, construct, complete, acquire, extend, or reroute. It does not, however, include the maintenance and operation of any existing system acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103021.

“Existing system” means any transit service or system of a publicly or privately owned public utility, or division thereof, which was operating on January 1, 1974, entirely within the county, or which operated at least 75 percent of its revenue vehicle miles for 1973 within the county, but does not include a charter-party carrier or the charter service of a passenger stage corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

103022.

“Existing taxi service” means any public passenger transportation service which (1) is not subject to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the Public Utilities Commission, (2) is available for hire on an exclusive or shared-ride basis, (3) is on call or demand over the public streets within the county in a motor vehicle of distinctive color or insignia equipped with a taximeter which is demand activated and operated by a licensed driver at the direction of passengers, and (4) was operating on January 1, 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Formation of District [103050. - 103085.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [103050. - 103053.]

103050.

The San Mateo County Transit District may be formed as provided in this chapter and, when so formed, may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103051.

The district shall include all the incorporated and unincorporated territory lying within the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103052.

The board of supervisors may, after notice published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code and public hearing, adopt a resolution declaring that, in its opinion, public interest or necessity demands the formation of the San Mateo County Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103053.

The district shall not be subject to the Knox-Nisbet Act (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code), except as to dissolution proceedings under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 103700).

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation Election [103070. - 103079.]

103070.

Upon adoption of the resolution provided for in Section 103052, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution calling an election within the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the proposed district shall be formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103071.

The resolution calling the formation election shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. The resolution shall:

(a) Call and provide notice of the special election.

(b) Fix a date of election.

(c) State the question to be submitted to the voters pursuant to Section 103072.

(d) Contain such other matters as may be necessary to call and provide notice of such election, and to provide for the
 conduct and the canvass of the returns thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103072.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and, in addition thereto, the following: Shall the “San Mateo County Transit District” be formed?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103073.

The county registrar of voters shall mail a notice of polling place, and the date and purpose, of the election to each registered voter of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103074.

The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code relating to ballot arguments and analyses shall be applicable to the formation election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 212.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

103075.

The general elections provisions of the Elections Code, as far as they may be applicable, relating to the qualifications of voters, the manner of voting, the form of the ballot, the duties of precinct and election officers, the canvassing of returns, and all other particulars shall govern the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103076.

No person shall be entitled to vote at the election unless he is a registered voter of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103077.

The county registrar of voters shall canvass the returns and certify the election results to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103078.

The board of supervisors shall make all provisions for the holding of the election throughout the district as proposed, and the cost of the election shall be a charge against the general funds of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103079.

If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote in favor of the formation of the district, the board of supervisors shall adopt an order declaring the result of the election and declaring the district to be formed, and shall cause a certified copy of such order to be filed with the Secretary of State, at which time the formation of the district shall be deemed complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contest of Validity of Formation [103085. - 103085.]

103085.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of the election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the formation of the district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of the formation is denied shall be commenced within 90 days from the date of filing the order declaring the result of the election with the Secretary of State. Otherwise, the formation and the legal existence of the district shall be held to be valid and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Government of District [103100. - 103180.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [103100. - 103113.]

103100.

The government of the district shall be vested in a board of directors, which shall consist of nine members, selected as follows:

(a) Three members, two of whom shall, at the time of their appointments and during their service as directors, be members of the board of supervisors and one of whom shall possess expertise in the field of transportation, appointed by the board of supervisors.

(b) Three members, all of whom shall be
 city council members at the time of their appointments and during their service as directors, appointed by the city selection committee created pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 50270), Chapter 1, Part 1, Division 1, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(c) Three members, one of whom shall be a resident of the coastal zone as defined in Section 27100 of the Public Resources Code, at the time of their appointments and during their service as directors, appointed by the six members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 445.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

103102.

Within 30 days after the adoption of the order declaring the district formed, the members of the board of directors appointed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 103100 shall meet in the chambers of the board of supervisors. The date of the first meeting shall be prescribed by the clerk of the board of supervisors. At that meeting, the three members to be appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 103100 shall be appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103103.

The board at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the first meeting in January, shall elect a chairman who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairman who shall preside in his absence. In the event of their absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairman pro tem, who, while so acting, shall have all of the authority of the chairman.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103104.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103105.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and all official acts of the board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103106.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103107.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103108.

Except for the terms of office of the members of the first board, the term of office of each member shall be four years and until the appointment and qualification of his successor. The members of the first board shall classify themselves by lot so that the term of office of four members is two years and of five members is four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103109.

The expiration date of the term of office of each member shall be the 31st day of December in the year in which his term is to expire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103111.

The body which originally appointed a member whose term has expired shall appoint his successor for a full term of four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103112.

Any vacancy on the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the body which originally appointed the member whose office has become vacant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103113.

Each member of the board shall receive compensation, as determined by the board, in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for attending each meeting of the board and each committee meeting, but not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) in any month, and shall receive his or her actual necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Board of Directors [103140. - 103141.]

103140.

The board is the legislative body of the district and shall determine all questions of district policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103141.

It shall be the duty of the board and it shall have the power to:

(a) Determine the transit facilities to be acquired and constructed by the district, the manner of operation, and the means to finance them.

(b) Adopt an annual budget for the district and fix the compensation of its officers and employees.

(c) Fix rates, rentals, charges, and classifications of transit service operated by the district.

(d) Adopt an
 administrative code, by ordinance, which shall prescribe the powers and duties of district officers, the method of appointment of district employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the district.

(e) Adopt by ordinance, rules and regulations governing the use of transit facilities owned or operated by the district.

(f) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the district to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(g) Appoint such advisory commissions as it deems necessary.

(h) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Officers [103160. - 103162.]

103160.

The officers of the district shall consist of the members of the board, the chairman of the board, a secretary, a general manager, a legal counsel, a controller, a treasurer, and such other officers, assistants and deputies as the board may deem necessary and provide for by ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103161.

The county may render such assistance to the district as it may require, including the performance by officers of the county as ex officio officers of the district, of the functions of general manager, legal counsel, controller, and treasurer. The district shall reimburse the county for the services performed by the county to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103162.

Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, and Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 3600), of Title 1 of the Government Code shall apply to all officers, employees, and contracts of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Manager [103180. - 103180.]

103180.

The powers and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To head the administrative branch of the district and to be responsible to the board for the proper administration of all affairs of the district.

(b) To appoint, supervise, suspend, or remove district officers other than members of the board and officers appointed by the board.

(c) To supervise and direct the preparation of the annual budget for the board and be responsible for its administration after its adoption.

(d) To formulate and present to the board plans for transit facilities within the district and the means to finance them.

(e) To supervise the planning, acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the transit facilities of the district.

(f) To prepare and submit to the board, as soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, a complete report of the finances and administrative activities of the district for the preceding year.

(g) To perform such other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Functions of District [103200. - 103399.11.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Powers [103200. - 103204.]

103200.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103201.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103202.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103203.

The district may levy and collect, or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose, as provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103204.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, district elections shall be called, held, and conducted as provided by law for county elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [103220. - 103226.]

103220.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103221.

The district may contract with any department or agency of the United States of America, with any public agency, or with any person upon such terms and conditions as the board finds is for the best interest of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103222.

(a) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(b) To the extent practicable, the district shall obtain a minimum
 of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), but does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(c) Notice requesting bids required by this section shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation and on the district’s procurement Internet Web site. These publications shall be made at least 10 days before the bids are received. The board may reject any and all bids and readvertise at its discretion.

(d) This section applies solely to the procurement of supplies, equipment, and materials, and shall not apply to construction contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 143, Sec. 2.   (AB 2030)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

103223.

If, after rejecting bids received under Section 103222, the board determines and declares by a two-thirds vote of all of its members that, in its opinion, the supplies, equipment, or materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase these supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions regarding contracts, bids, or advertisements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103225.

The district may insure against any accident or destruction of the system or any part thereof. The district may insure against loss of revenues from any cause whatsoever. It may provide, in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of any bonds, for the carrying of insurance in such amount and of such character as may be specified, and for the payment of the premiums thereon. The district may also provide insurance as provided in Part 6 (commencing with Section 989), Division 3.6, Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103226.

The district may contract for the services of independent contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Property [103240. - 103244.]

103240.

The district may take by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103240.5.

(a) The district may take by gift, or take or convey by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, transit-oriented joint development projects that meet the definition and requirement set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, a transit-oriented joint development project is a commercial,
 residential, or mixed-use development that is undertaken in connection with existing, planned, or proposed intermodal transit facilities and is located 14 mile or less from the external boundaries of that facility.

(2) Any transit-oriented joint development project created under this section shall comply with the land use and zoning regulations of the city, county, or city and county in which the project is located.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 103265 or any other provision of law, the authority granted under this section is subject to the land use and zoning regulations of the city, county, or city and county jurisdiction in which the transit-oriented joint development is located, in accordance with the Planning and Zoning Law (Title 7 (commencing with Section 65000) of the
 Government Code), relating to zoning.

(d) The authority granted under this section extends to any joint powers agency of which the district is a member and for which the district serves as the managing agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 624, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

103242.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The district, in exercising such power, shall, in addition to the damages for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost, exclusive of betterment and with credit for salvage value, of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, or poles of any public agency or utility which is required to be moved to a new location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------

103243.

The Public Utilities Commission of the state shall have and exercise power and jurisdiction to fix just compensation to be paid for the taking of any property of a public utility in eminent domain proceedings brought by the district. No taking or acquisition by the district which would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of the property of a railroad corporation, as defined in Section 230, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after a hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of such property and that such taking or acquisition will not unreasonably
 impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical, and efficient service. The district may commence and maintain such eminent domain proceedings in the Public Utilities Commission or the superior court at its option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 502.)
-------------------------------------------

103244.
